Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Chapter 45. Adult Protective Services
[Repealed]

§§ 43-45-1 through 43-45-31.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1982, ch. 498, § 17, as amended by Laws, 1985, ch. 490, § 17.

§§43-45-1 and43-45-3. [Laws, 1982, ch. 498, §§ 1, 2; reenacted, Laws, 1985, ch. 490, §§ 1, 2]

§43-45-5. [Laws, 1982, ch. 498, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 472, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1985, ch. 490, § 3]

§43-45-7. [Laws, 1982, ch. 498, § 4; reenacted, Laws, 1985, ch. 490, § 4]

§43-45-9. [Laws, 1982, ch. 498, § 5; Laws, 1983, ch. 472, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1985, ch. 490, § 5]

§§43-45-11 and43-45-13. [Laws, 1982, ch. 498, §§ 6, 7; reenacted, Laws, 1985, ch. 490, §§ 6, 7]

§43-45-15. [Laws, 1982, ch. 498, § 8; Laws, 1983, ch. 472, § 3; reenacted, Laws, 1985, ch. 490, § 8]

§§43-45-17 and43-45-19. [Laws, 1982, ch. 498, §§ 9, 10; reenacted, Laws, 1985, ch. 490, §§ 9, 10]

§43-45-21. [Laws, 1982, ch. 498, § 11; Laws, 1983, ch. 472, § 4; reenacted, Laws, 1985, ch. 490, § 11]

§§43-45-23 through43-45-31. [Laws, 1982, ch. 498, §§ 12-16; reenacted, Laws, 1985, ch. 490, §§ 12-16]